District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0039.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Closing of a Portion of a Public Alley and Dedication of Land for Alley
Purposes in Square 756, S.O. 24-00310, Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. (a) Pursuant to section 404 of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 787; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.04), and consistent with the Street
and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law
4-201; D.C. Official Code § 9-201.01 et seq.) (“Act”), the Council finds that the portion of the
public alley system in Square 756, as shown on the Surveyor’s plat filed under S.O. 24-00310, is
unnecessary for alley purposes and orders it closed, with title to the land to vest as shown on the
Surveyor’s plat.
(b) Pursuant to section 302 of the Act (D.C. Official Code § 9-203.02), the Council
accepts the dedication of a portion of Lot 806 in Square 756 for public alley purposes, as shown
on the Surveyor’s plat filed under S.O. 24-00310.
Sec. 3. The ordering of the alley closure and acceptance of the dedication of land set forth
in section 2 are contingent upon the satisfaction of all conditions set forth by the District
Department of Transportation in the official file for S.O. 24-00310 prior to recordation of the
plat by the Surveyor.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2